Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2542
Federal law; compliance.

Whenever federal Hatch Act provisions are applicable to programs, action shall be taken to assure that all personnel practices in those programs are in accordance with federal regulations. Those practices found not to be in compliance with such regulations shall not be implemented in those programs.

Laws 1994, LB 212, § 9.